Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 3. Prepaid Hospital, Medical-Surgical or Other Health ServicePlans

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 15, 550 to 563; 44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance 978 to 1003, 1052 to 1107.

44 C.J.S. Insurance § 14; 45 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 778, 779; 46 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 923, 927, 1122, 1241.

§ 26-22-301.
Prepaid hospital, medical-surgical or other health service plans subject to provisions of code; exceptions.

Any corporation which establishes, maintains or operates prepaid hospital, medical-surgical or other health service plans, or combination thereof, in which hospital, medical-surgical or other health service may be provided to its members or subscribers by hospitals or physicians with which the corporation has contracted for that purpose, is transacting insurance and subject to regulation and taxation as an insurer under this code [title 26].

This section does not apply to company-operated or employee-operated organizations, not covered by hospital or sickness insurance, but formed and operated for the purpose of providing hospital or medical services supported or financed by dues paid to the associations by or on behalf of those who are employees or pensioners of the company.

This section does not apply to a direct primary care agreement as defined in W.S. 26-1-104(a)(vi).

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-453.1; W.S. 1977, §

26-23-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2016 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 29, 2016.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Coverage and exclusions under hospital or medical service contracts, 81 ALR2d 927.

Insured's receipt of or right to workmen's compensation benefits as affecting recovery under hospital or medical expense policy, 40 ALR3d 1012.

Validity and construction of prescription drug insurance plan, 42 ALR3d 897.

What constitutes a “hospital” within coverage or exclusionary clauses of hospitalization policy, 46 ALR3d 1244.

What conditions constitute “disease” within terms of hospitalization insurance policy, 61 ALR3d 822.

Construction of provision in health policy extending coverage to persons “actually in the employ of” the policyholder, 64 ALR3d 1178.

Right of insured under individual medical care insurance policy to coverage afforded by group policy from which he directly transferred on termination of his employment, 66 ALR3d 1192.

Right of Blue Cross or Blue Shield or similar hospital or medical service organization to be subrogated to certificate holder's claims against tortfeasor, 73 ALR3d 1140.

Collateral source rule: injured person's hospitalization or medical insurance as affecting damages recoverable, 77 ALR3d 415.

What are necessary funeral expenses within coverage of medical payment and funeral expense provision of insurance policy, 87 ALR3d 497.

Construction and application of provision in health or hospitalization policy excluding or postponing coverage of illness originating prior to issuance of policy or within stated time, 94 ALR3d 990.

Priority and apportionment of liability between medical and hospital expense insurers, 25 ALR4th 1022.

The propriety, under ERISA (29 USCS § 1001 et seq.) and the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USCS § 12101 et seq.) of capping health insurance coverage for HIV-related claims, 131 ALR Fed 191.

The 2016 amendment

added (c).

Laws 2016, ch. 6 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 29, 2016.